Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 24 Uniform Trade Secrets Act

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 63, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 40-24-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Improper means” includes theft, bribery, misrepresentation, breach or inducement of a breach of duty to maintain secrecy or espionage through electronic or other means;

“Misappropriation” means:

Acquisition of a trade secret of another by a person who knows or has reason to know that the trade secret was acquired by improper means; or

Disclosure or use of a trade secret of another without express or implied consent by a person who:

Used improper means to acquire knowledge of the trade secret;

Before a material change of his position, knew or had reason to know that it was a trade secret and that knowledge of it had been acquired by accident or mistake; or

At the time of disclosure or use knew or had reason to know that his knowledge of the trade secret was:

Derived from or through a person who has utilized improper means to acquire it;

Acquired under circumstances giving rise to a duty to maintain its secrecy or limit its use; or

Derived from or through a person who owed a duty to the person seeking relief to maintain its secrecy or limit its use.

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Trade secret” means information, including a formula, pattern, compilation, program device, method, technique or process that:

Derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by other persons who can obtain economic value from its disclosure or use; and

Is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the circumstances to maintain its secrecy.

“This act” means W.S.

40-24-101

through

40-24-110

.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 63, § 1.

§ 40-24-102.
Injunctive relief.

Actual or threatened misappropriation may be enjoined. Upon application to the court an injunction shall be terminated when the trade secret has ceased to exist, but the injunction may be continued for an additional reasonable period of time in order to eliminate commercial advantage that otherwise would be derived from the misappropriation.

In exceptional circumstances, an injunction may condition future use upon payment of a reasonable royalty for no longer than the period of time for which use could have been prohibited. Exceptional circumstances include, but are not limited to, a material and prejudicial change of position prior to acquiring knowledge or reason to know of misappropriation that renders a prohibitive injunction inequitable.

In appropriate circumstances, affirmative acts to protect a trade secret may be compelled by court order.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 63, § 1.

§ 40-24-103.
Damages.

Except to the extent that a material and prejudicial change of position prior to acquiring knowledge or reason to know of misappropriation renders a monetary recovery inequitable, a complainant is entitled to recover damages for misappropriation. Damages can include both the actual loss caused by misappropriation and the unjust enrichment caused by misappropriation that is not taken into account in computing actual loss. In lieu of damages measured by any other methods, the damages caused by misappropriation may be measured by imposition of liability for a reasonable royalty for a misappropriator’s unauthorized disclosure or use of a trade secret.

If willful and malicious misappropriation exists, the court may award exemplary damages in the amount not exceeding twice any award made under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 63, § 1.

§ 40-24-104.
Attorney's fees.

A court may award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party if:

A claim of misappropriation is made in bad faith;

A motion to terminate an injunction is made or resisted in bad faith; or

Willful and malicious misappropriation exists.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 63, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 40-24-105.
Preservation of secrecy.

In any action under this act, a court shall preserve the secrecy of an alleged trade secret by reasonable means, which may include granting protective orders in connection with discovery proceedings, holding in-camera hearings, sealing the records of the action and ordering any person involved in the litigation not to disclose an alleged trade secret without prior court approval.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 63, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-24-101(a)(v).

§ 40-24-106.
Statute of limitations.

An action for misappropriation must be brought within four (4) years after the misappropriation is discovered or by the exercise of reasonable diligence should have been discovered. For the purposes of this section, a continuing misappropriation constitutes a single claim.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 63, § 1.

§ 40-24-107.
Effect on other law.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this act displaces conflicting tort, restitutionary and other law of this state providing civil remedies for misappropriation of a trade secret.

This act does not affect:

Contractual remedies, whether or not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret;

Other civil remedies that are not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret; or

Criminal remedies, whether or not based upon misappropriation of a trade secret.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 63, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-24-101(a)(v).

§ 40-24-108.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This act shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this act among states enacting it.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 63, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-24-101(a)(v).

§ 40-24-109.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the Uniform Trade Secrets Act.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 63, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-24-101(a)(v).

§ 40-24-110.
Time of taking effect.

This act does not apply to misappropriation occurring prior to July 1, 2006. With respect to a continuing misappropriation that began prior to July 1, 2006, the act does not apply to the continuing misappropriation that occurs after July 1, 2006.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 63, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-24-101(a)(v).